New York, session 2025-2026, S9797.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 110 of the New York city civil court act is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision (r) to read as follows: 3 (r) A separate subpart of the housing part established by this section 4 shall be devoted to actions and proceedings involving cooperative and 5 condominium buildings for such matters which are within the jurisdiction 6 of the housing part. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06155-01-5